Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.050

Seal of courts.

The seals of the superior courts of the several counties of the state shall be, until otherwise provided by law, the vignette of General George Washington, with the words "Seal of the Superior Court of . . . . . . County, State of Washington," surrounding the vignette.

[ 1890 p 345 s 17; RRS s 38.]